apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="accueill/ir__vblex">
      <e><p><l>aient</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ait</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ant</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ant</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erai</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eraient</l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erais</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erais</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erait</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eras</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erez</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eriez</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erions</l>           <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erons</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eront</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ies</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iez</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iez</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ions</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ions</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irent</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isse</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>issent</l>           <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>isses</l>            <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>issiez</l>           <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>issions</l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ons</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ons</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ons</l>              <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>îmes</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ît</l>               <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>îtes</l>             <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="accueillir" a="eleka">           <i>accueill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accueillir">                     <i>accueill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="accueillir" r="RL" a="eleka">    <i>accueill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assaillir">                      <i>assaill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cueillir">                       <i>cueill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="défaillir" a="eleka">            <i>défaill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="recueillir" r="LR">              <i>recueill</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="survenir" a="bech">              <i>surven</i><par n="accueill/ir__vblex"/></e>
